Utah statutes.
17-27a-509.7.   Transferrable development rights.

A county may adopt an ordinance:

(1)  designating sending zones and receiving zones within the unincorporated area of the county; and

(2)  allowing the transfer of transferrable development rights from an owner of land within a sending zone to an owner of land within a receiving zone.

